Hawaii statutes.
[§435H-7.5] Connector legislative oversight
committee. (a) There is established the connector legislative oversight
committee.

(b) The oversight committee shall consist of
eight members who shall include:

(1) The chair of the house standing committee on
consumer protection and commerce;

(2) The chair of the house standing committee on
health;

(3) The chair of the house standing committee on
finance;

(4) The chair of the senate standing committee on
commerce and consumer protection;

(5) The chair of the senate standing committee on
health;

(6) The chair of the senate standing committee on
ways and means;

(7) One member of the minority party of the house, to
be selected by the minority party leader; and

(8) One member of the minority party of the senate,
to be selected by the minority party leader.

(c) The chairs of the house committee on
consumer protection and commerce and the senate committee on commerce and
consumer protection shall serve as the co-chairs of the committee.

(d) The committee shall meet at least annually
as agreed upon by the co-chairs; provided that the committee shall meet no
later than December 1 of each year.

(e) The committee shall annually review the
report pursuant to section 435H-7.6 and the sustainability plan pursuant to
section 435H-3.5 that are submitted by the board and shall make recommendations
as needed to the house committee on finance and the senate committee on ways
and means. [L 2014, c 233, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next